Washington statutes.
RCW 15.64.050

Small farm direct marketing assistance program—Created—Duties.

(1) The small farm direct marketing assistance program is created.

(2) The director shall employ a small farm direct marketing assistant.

(3) The small farm direct marketing assistance program shall assist small farms in their direct marketing efforts. In carrying out this duty the program shall:

(a) Assist small farms in complying with federal, state, and local rules and regulations as they apply to direct marketing of agricultural products;

(b) Assist in developing infrastructure to increase direct marketing opportunities for small farms;

(c) Provide information on direct marketing opportunities for small farms;

(d) Promote localized food production systems;

(e) Increase access to information for farmers wishing to sell farm products directly to consumers;

(f) Identify and help reduce market barriers facing small farms in direct marketing;

(g) Assist in developing and submitting proposals to grant programs to assist small farm direct marketing efforts; and

(h) Perform other functions that will assist small farms in directly marketing their products.

[ 2007 c 522 s 947; 2007 c 122 s 1; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—2007 c 522: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2007 c 522 s 1801.]

Effective date—2007 c 522: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 15, 2007]." [ 2007 c 522 s 1802.]

Findings—2001 2nd sp.s. c 3: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Many consumers in this state appreciate and seek out the opportunity to purchase local farm products.

(2) Consumers and small-scale farmers would both benefit from increased opportunities to market farm products locally. Direct marketing provides farmers with the opportunity to realize an increased share of consumers' food dollars and provides consumers with a greater opportunity to support local agriculture and understand farm operations, farm culture, and the role farms play in meeting our food needs.

(3) The state would greatly benefit from a focused effort to increase the economic viability and profitability of small farms through increasing their ability to market their products directly to consumers.

(4) Direct marketing opportunities are often not feasible for farmers to undertake because of market barriers and the difficulty of obtaining information related to marketing.

(5) A direct marketing assistance program for small farmers could provide the needed information, technical assistance, and barrier clearing work that is a key to increasing direct marketing of farm products." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 1.]